Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1174.
do enact as follows:SB1174,14Section 1. 118.01 (2) (d) 2. d. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1174,2,21118.01 (2) (d) 2. d. Awareness about drug abuse, including prescription drug 2abuse, and; drug abuse prevention; fentanyl; and the use of an opioid antagonist.SB1174,23Section 2. Initial applicability.SB1174,2,44(1) This act first applies to instruction provided in the 2026-27 school year.SB1174,2,55